Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.645.030

Appeal to be heard de novo and expeditiously.

Any appeal to the superior court shall be heard de novo by the superior court. Such appeal shall be heard expeditiously.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 42. Formerly RCW 28A.88.015.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.